Wisconsin, session 2025, AB36.
do enact as follows:AB36,11Section 1. 40.22 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB36,2,6240.22 (1) Except as otherwise provided in sub. (2) and s. 40.26 (6) and (7), each 3employee currently in the service of, and receiving earnings from, a state agency or 4other participating employer shall be included within the provisions of the 5Wisconsin retirement system as a participating employee of that state agency or 6participating employer.AB36,27Section 2. 40.22 (2m) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB36,2,14840.22 (2m) (intro.) Except as otherwise provided in s. 40.26 (6) and (7), an 9employee who was a participating employee before July 1, 2011, who is not expected 10to work at least one-third of what is considered full-time employment by the 11department, as determined by rule, and who is not otherwise excluded under sub. 12(2) from becoming a participating employee shall become a participating employee if 13he or she is subsequently employed by the state agency or other participating 14employer for either of the following periods:AB36,315Section 3. 40.22 (2r) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB36,3,61640.22 (2r) (intro.) Except as otherwise provided in s. 40.26 (6) and (7), an 1employee who was not a participating employee before July 1, 2011, who is not 2expected to work at least two-thirds of what is considered full-time employment by 3the department, as determined by rule, and who is not otherwise excluded under 4sub. (2) from becoming a participating employee shall become a participating 5employee if he or she is subsequently employed by the state agency or other 6participating employer for either of the following periods:AB36,47Section 4. 40.22 (3) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB36,3,10840.22 (3) (intro.) Except as otherwise provided in s. 40.26 (6) and (7), a person 9who qualifies as a participating employee shall be included within, and shall be 10subject to, the Wisconsin retirement system effective on one of the following dates:AB36,511Section 5. 40.26 (7) of the statutes is created to read:AB36,3,131240.26 (7) (a) In this subsection, “law enforcement officer” has the meaning 13given in s. 165.85 (2) (c).AB36,3,1814(b) Subsections (1) to (5) do not apply to a participant who applies for an 15annuity or lump sum payment during the period in which at least 75 days have 16elapsed between the participant’s termination of employment and becoming an 17employee or contractor providing employee services with a participating employer if 18all of the following conditions are met:AB36,3,19191. The participant is a retired law enforcement officer or firefighter.AB36,3,23202. At the time the participant terminates his or her employment with a 21participating employer, the participant does not have an agreement with any 22participating employer to return to employment or enter into a contract to provide 23employee services for the employer.AB36,4,213. The participant elects on a form provided by the department to not become 2a participating employee.AB36,63Section 6. Initial applicability.AB36,4,54(1) This act first applies to a participant under the Wisconsin Retirement 5System who terminates employment on the effective date of this subsection.AB36,4,66